Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-643
Birth or death certificate; additional amendment; requirements.

When an entry on a vital record has been amended, that entry shall not be amended again unless (1) it can be shown that the first amendment was made through mistake, or (2) a court order is received from a court of competent jurisdiction.

Laws 1971, LB 245, § 10.